Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-163
Department; cancellation of certificate of title; procedure.

(1) The department shall check with its records all duplicate certificates of title received from a county clerk or designated county official. If it appears that a certificate of title has been improperly issued, the department shall cancel the same. Upon cancellation of any certificate of title, the department shall notify the county clerk or designated county official who issued the same, and such county clerk or designated county official shall thereupon enter the cancellation upon his or her records. The department shall also notify the person to whom such certificate of title was issued, as well as any lienholders appearing thereon, of the cancellation and shall demand the surrender of such certificate of title, but the cancellation shall not affect the validity of any lien noted thereon. The holder of such certificate of title shall return the same to the department forthwith.

(2) If a certificate of registration has been issued to the holder of a certificate of title so canceled, the department shall immediately cancel the same and demand the return of such certificate of registration and license plates or tags, and the holder of such certificate of registration and license plates or tags shall return the same to the department forthwith.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 63.